Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4606.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. In all cases where husband and wife If spouses own any an interest in land as tenants by the entirety, such the tenancy by the entirety may be terminated by a conveyance from either one spouse to the other of his or her the spouse's interest in the land so held. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.